Washington statutes.
RCW 7.71.040

Chapter does not limit or repeal other immunities conferred by law.

Nothing in this chapter limits or repeals any other immunities conferred upon participants in the peer review process contained in any other state or federal law.

[ 1987 c 269 s 4.]